Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NURSING HOME WORKFORCE STANDARDS BOARD; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Nursing Home Workforce Standards Board for grants to certified worker organizations to assist them in carrying out their duties under Minnesota Statutes, section 181.214. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end